Utah statutes.
16-16-1404.   Issuance of certificate of authority.

Unless the division determines that an application for a certificate of authority does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter, the division, upon payment by the foreign cooperative of all filing fees, shall file the application, issue a certificate of authority, and send a copy of the filed certificate, together with a receipt for the fees, to the foreign cooperative or its representative.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

